Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TEACHER CANDIDATE PERFORMANCE ASSESSMENT; RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must discontinue requiring parts, portions, tasks, or the totality of the edTPA performance assessment to be completed by teacher candidates. The board must amend Minnesota Rules, part 8705.2100, to remove requirements for the performance assessment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin STUDENT TEACHER PLACEMENT; RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must amend Minnesota Rules, part 8705.1010, to require a student teacher to be placed within 30 miles of their preferred location or school site unless the teacher preparatory program and teacher candidate mutually agree to a placement further away from the teacher candidate's preferred location. new text end